contrib/python/pyphen/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_hu_HU.dic
UTF-8
% Hungarian hyphenation patterns with non-standard hyphenation patch
% ------------------------------------------------------------------
% Patch version: 2020-12-16
%
% Language: Hungarian (hu HU)
% Origin:   http://www.github.hu/bencenagy/huhyphn
% License:  MPL/GPL/LGPL license, 2011
% Author:   Nagy Bence <nagybence (at) tipogral (dot) hu>
% Version:  v20110815
% Patch:    László Németh <nemeth (at) numbertext (dot) org>
%           source: http://sourceforge.net/project/magyarispell (OOo huhyphn)
%           license: MPL/GPL/LGPL
% Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns v20110815
%
% ***** BEGIN LICENSE BLOCK *****
% Version: MPL 1.1/GPL 2.0/LGPL 2.1
%
% The contents of this file are subject to the Mozilla Public License Version
% 1.1 (the "License"); you may not use this file except in compliance with
% the License. You may obtain a copy of the License at
% http://www.mozilla.org/MPL/
%
% Software distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" basis,
% WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, either express or implied. See the License
% for the specific language governing rights and limitations under the
% License.
%
% The Original Code is the Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns.
%
% The Initial Developer of the Original Code is
% Bence Nagy.
% Portions created by the Initial Developer are Copyright (C) 2003
% the Initial Developer. All Rights Reserved.
%
% Contributor(s):
%   Bence Nagy <bence.nagy@gmail.com>
%
% Alternatively, the contents of this file may be used under the terms of
% either the GNU General Public License Version 2 or later (the "GPL"), or
% the GNU Lesser General Public License Version 2.1 or later (the "LGPL"),
% in which case the provisions of the GPL or the LGPL are applicable instead
% of those above. If you wish to allow use of your version of this file only
% under the terms of either the GPL or the LGPL, and not to allow others to
% use your version of this file under the terms of the MPL, indicate your
% decision by deleting the provisions above and replace them with the notice
% and other provisions required by the GPL or the LGPL. If you do not delete
% the provisions above, a recipient may use your version of this file under
% the terms of any one of the MPL, the GPL or the LGPL.
%
% ***** END LICENSE BLOCK *****
%
% Encoding: Cork/T1/EC
%
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 3
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
.a2
.ada2t1á1t1a2
.a1da
.ada1tá
.ada2t1e2
.adás1s
.a1dá
.adá2s3z
.ad1y2é.
.ad1yi
.ag1os
.a1go
.ag2ra
.a2gyag1g
.ag2y
.a1gya
.agy1á2ram
.a1gyá
.agyá1ra
.agy1árt
.a1gy1e2
.a1gyo2
.agyon1
.a1gy1ó2
.2a1gy1ű2
.akác1c
.a1ká
.aká2c2s
.ak2h
.a1ko2
.ak2t1é2r.
.ak1té
.ak2t1orr
.ak1to
.ak2t1ő2
.aku1p2
.a1ku
.ala2g1
.a1la
.ala1k1a2
.ala2k1ö2
.ala2k1ő2
.ala2pa
.ala2p1á
.al1eg
.a1le
.al1is
.a1li
.al2járn
.al1já
.al1je2
.al2j1el
.alje1l1ö2
.alo2m1
.a1lo
.al1os
.al2t1a2k
.al1ta
.al2t1erj
.al1te
.al2té2n
.al1té
.al2térn
.al2tért
.al2ti2n
.al1ti
.am1ak
.a1ma
.ango2l1ó2
.an1go
.an1th
.anti1s
.an1ti
.2apa1p2
.a1pa
.apá2ly1á2z
.a1pá
.ap2ál2y
.apá1lyá
.ar2a2ny1e2
.a1ra
.aran2y
.ara2s1ze
.aras2z
.2ar1á2c
.a1rá
.ar2cal
.ar1ca
.arc3c
.ar2c1e2
.ar2cél
.ar1cé
.ar2c3há
.arc2h
.ar2c3hoz
.ar1c1ho
.ar2cin
.ar1ci
.ar2ci1o
.ar2col
.ar1co
.ar2cö
.ar2c3s
.ar1kh
.at2h
.a1z1a2
.az1ám
.a1zá
.a1ze2
.a1z1ó2
.á2
.ács1é2k
.ác2s
.á1c1sé
.ág1árn
.á1gá
.ág1árt
.á1g1ó2
.ágy1a1la
.ág2y
.á1gya
.ágy1as2z
.ágy1árt
.á1gyá
.ágy1á2z
.á1l1a2
.á1l1é
.á1l1i2
.á2l1i2gaz1
.áli2g
.á2l1i1ga
.ál2l1alj
.ál1la
.ál2l1alt
.ál2lin
.ál1li
.ál1o2k
.á1lo
.á1l1ú
.ár1aj
.á1ra
.ár1ak1tá
.ár1a2l
.ára2m1e
.ár1a2p
.ára2s2z
.ár1a1s1zó
.ár1á2c
.á1rá
.ár1ál
.ár1á2z
.ár1d2
.á1re2
.ár1em
.á1ré2
.ár1ir
.á1ri
.ár2nye2l
.árn2y
.ár1nye
.ár1ol
.á1ro
.ár1om
.ár1os
.árrés1s
.ár1ré
.ár1s2
.ár1t2r
.ász1ál
.ás2z
.á1s1zá
.ász1árb
.ász1á2ré
.ász1á2ri
.ász1á2ro
.át1a2d
.á1ta
.át1a2k
.át1alt
.át1a2n
.át1ar
.át1a2s
.át1av
.á1t1á2
.á1t1e2
.á1t1é2
.á1t1i2
.át1ol
.á1to
.át1o2r
.át1o2s
.á1tó2
.át1óh
.át1óv
.á1t1ö2
.á1t1u
.á1t1ü2
.á1t1ű
.b2
.ba2b1a2rá
.1ba
.b2abar
.ba2bál
.ba1bá
.ba2b1e2
.ba2bol
.ba1bo
.ba2j1á2rat
.b2ajár
.ba1já
.bajá1ra
.ba2j1e
.ba2k1aszt
.2bakas
.ba1ka
.bakas2z
.ba2kál
.ba1ká
.ba2k1á2ro
.ba1ké2
.ba2k1ö2
.ba2ku2r
.ba1ku
.ba2l1e2g
.ba1le
.ba1ts
.ba2u
.bá2l1ó2
.1bá
.bá1r1a
.bá1th
.be2a2t.
.1be
.be1a
.be1d2
.be1i2
.be1kr
.be1str
.be1szk
.bes2z
.beté2t1e2l
.be1té
.beté1te
.be1tr
.bér2c3sí
.1bé
.bérc2s
.bé2r1o
.bi2ke
.1bi
.bi2os
.bi1o
.bi2ot
.bi1ta2
.bi2tag
.bi2t1á2
.bi2tel
.bi1te
.b2i2t1er
.bi2t1orr
.bi1to
.bi2tur
.bi1tu
.bo2g1ó2
.1bo
.bol2ta
.b2o2ly1ó2
.bol2y
.bo2nav
.bo1na1
.bo2raj
.bo1ra
.bo2ra2n
.bo2ras
.bo2rat
.bo2rác
.bo1rá
.bo2rál
.bo2r1odv
.bo1ro
.bor2sét
.bor1sé
.bort2
.bo2tá
.bra2i
.b1ra
.bu2s1z1e
.1bu
.bus2z
.c2
.cen2t1á
.1ce
.cen2t1ó2
.ce2t1e2l
.ce1te
.ce2t1ű
.cé2l1e2
.1cé
.ci2n1á2
.1ci
.ci1to1
.c2s2
.csa2k1
.1c1sa
.csa2p1á2g
.csa1pá
.csa2t1é2
.cse2l1ő2r
.1c1se
.cse1lő
.d2
.dac1c
.1da
.da2c3s
.da2i
.dal1an
.da1la
.da2lás
.da1lá
.da2l1e2
.da2l1ék
.da1lé
.d2a2lén
.da2l1í2
.da3lol
.da1lo
.da2l1ó2
.dan1n
.da2u
.den2g1
.1de
.dé2la
.1dé
.dé1re2
.dé2res
.dé2sa2
.di2a1fo
.1di
.di1a
.di2a1ka
.di2al
.di2c1sá
.dic2s
.di2ó1má
.di1ó
.d2ó2mor
.1dó
.dó1mo
.dú2ra
.1dú
.e2
.eb1eg
.e1be
.eb1ir
.e1bi
.e1b1í
.e1b1u2
.e1g2é
.egres1s
.eg1re
.e1gy1a2
.eg2y
.e1gy1á2
.egy1e2lőr
.e1gye
.egye1lő
.egy1ev
.egy1in
.e1gyi
.e1gy1ö2
.egy1ü2l
.e1gyü
.el1a2k
.e1la
.el1an
.el1ap
.ela2s
.el1ass
.el1aszn
.elas2z
.el1a1s1zo
.el1aszv
.e1l1á2
.el1e2c
.e1le
.el1eger
.ele1ge
.ele2gyá2
.eleg2y
.el1e2h
.el1ejt
.el1e2l
.ele2ma
.ele2má
.ele2meg
.ele1me
.ele2mel
.e1l1eme1le
.el1e2mels
.el1e2melt
.el1e2més
.ele1mé
.el1e2n
.el1e2p
.el1e2r
.el1e2se
.el1e2sés
.ele1sé
.el1esh
.el1e2si
.el1esn
.el1e2ső
.el1ess
.el1es1te
.el1estél
.eles1té
.el1es1tü
.el1e2sü
.el1esv
.el1e2s2z
.el1e2t
.el1e2vet
.ele1ve
.el1e2vez
.el1e1vi
.elé2d
.e1lé
.el1é1de
.el1é2gek
.elé1ge
.el1éh
.el1ékez
.elé1ke
.el1é2le
.elé2n
.el1é1ne
.el1é2p
.el1é2r
.el1é2te2t.
.elé1te
.el1é2v
.el1id
.e1li
.el1ig
.el1i2h
.el1ik
.el1i2mit
.eli1mi
.el1in
.el1ir
.el1i2s
.eli2t1o
.el1itt2a.
.elit1ta
.el1itták
.elit1tá
.el1izz
.e1l1í
.elle1ge2
.el1le
.e1lo2
.el1okk
.el1o1ko
.el1or
.e1l1ó2
.e1lö2
.el1ök
.el1ö1le
.el1ö1lé
.el1ölh
.el1ö1li
.el1öl2j.
.el1öl1je
.el1öl1jé
.el1öl1jü
.el1öl1ne
.el1öln2é.
.elöl1né
.el1ölném
.el1öl1ni
.el1ö1lő
.el1öl2t.
.el1öl1te
.el1öl1té
.el1öltn
.el1öl1tü
.el1ölün
.elö1lü
.el1ölv
.el1öv
.elő1é2
.e1lő
.el1s2
.el1t2
.e1l1u
.e1lü2
.el1ü2l.
.el1ülh
.el1ü1li
.el1ülj
.el1üln
.el1ül1te
.el1ülv
.el2v1el
.el1ve
.el2v1é2g.
.el1vé
.es1er
.e1se
.ese2tel
.ese1te
.es2t1a
.es2t1á
.es2t1é2k2e.
.es1té
.esté1ke
.es2t1é2kek
.et2h
.etilén1g2
.e1ti
.eti1lé
.evés1s
.e1vé
.ex1el
.e1xe
.e1z1á
.ez1e2l
.e1ze
.é2
.édes3s
.é1de
.é1g1a2
.ég1eg
.é1ge
.ég1e2re1i
.ége1re
.ége2s
.ég1es2z
.ég1é2r.
.é1gé
.ég1é2ré
.ég1érn
.égés3s
.égé2s2z
.ég1észb
.ég1é1s1ze
.ég1é1s1zé
.ég1észn
.ég1észr
.é1g1ö2
.é1g1u2
.éh1év
.é1hé
.é1j1a2
.é1j1á2
.éj1el
.é1je
.é1j1u
.é1k1a2
.é1k1á
.ékes1s
.é1ke
.ék1ir
.é1ki
.é1k1o
.é1l1a2
.él2c1i
.éli2k
.é1li
.él1i1ke
.él2v1á2
.ép1es
.é1pe
.ép2pa
.ép2p1el
.ép1pe
.ép2pé
.ép2po
.ér1a2n
.é1ra
.ér2c1e2l
.ér1ce
.ér2c1é2j
.ér1cé
.ér2cék
.ér2c3sí
.érc2s
.ér1e2l
.é1re
.ér1e2s
.éré2s2z
.é1ré
.ér1é1s1zé
.ér1é2t
.é1rü2
.ér1ül
.ér2vad
.ér1va
.ér2val
.ér2v1é2g.
.ér1vé
.ész1a2l
.és2z
.é1s1za
.2é1s1z1á
.é1s1ze2
.ész1el
.ész1em
.ész1es
.ész1é2k
.é1s1zé
.észigaz1
.é1s1zi
.é2sz1i2ga
.é1s1z1o
.é1s1z1ő2
.ész2t1örv
.ész1tö
.é1s1zü2
.ész1ü1lő
.év1á2g
.é1vá
.év1es2s2z
.é1ve
.év1é2g
.é1vé
.év1é2k
.f2
.ﬀ
.fa2i2t.
.1fa
.fa1i
.fa2leg
.fa1le
.fa1né
.fa2r1ont
.fa1ro
.fas2
.fa1st
.fat2
.fa1tr
.fe2le1me
.1fe
.fe1le
.fe2l1es2s2z
.fe2lev
.fé2k1e2l
.1fé
.fé1ke
.fé2m1a2
.fé2m1á2
.fil2mé1ré
.1fi
.fil1mé
.ﬁl2mé1ré
.1ﬁ
.ﬁl1mé
.fin2ge
.ﬁn2ge
.fog2ó2s3zá
.1fo
.fo1gó
.fogó1s2z2
.fol2t1a2
.fö2lő
.1fö
.fö2lü2l.
.fö1lü
.fölü2l1e2
.g2
.ga2za2n
.1ga
.ga1za
.2gá2t1al
.1gá
.gá1ta
.gá2te
.gá2z1ó2
.gáz2s2
.gá2z1su
.gáz1z
.gene2a
.1ge
.ge1ne
.ge2od
.ge1o
.ge2os
.gesz2t1í
.ges2z
.gé2d1
.1gé
.gé2na2
.gé2ná2
.g2én3n
.gé2pe2lem
.3g2épel
.gé1pe
.gépe1le
.gé2p1i2p
.gé1pi
.giga1s
.1gi
.gi1ga
.gonor1
.1go
.g2o1no
.gonorr2
.gó2ce
.1gó
.gó2la
.gó2lá
.gó2le2l
.gó1le
.gó2l1e2s
.góli2g
.gó1li
.gó2l1i1ga
.gó2li2s
.gő2z1á2
.1gő
.gő2zen
.gő1ze
.gő2z1ő
.gő2z2s
.gu2i
.1gu
.h2
.ha2b1e2
.1ha
.ha2b1ol
.3ha1bo
.ha2bor
.ha2b1ő
.ha2b1u
.ha2dal
.ha1da
.ha2d1e2
.ha2d2z
.ha2ik
.ha1i
.ha2j1e2
.ha2jom
.ha1jo
.ha2lác
.3ha1lá
.halá2l1ó2
.ha2lárv
.ha2leg
.ha1le
.ha2l1e2l
.h2a2lep
.ha2let
.h2a2l1e2v
.ha2li2s
.ha1li
.han2ga2d
.3hang
.han1ga
.han2g1e2
.h2a2sor
.ha1so
.has3s2z
.h2a2tag
.ha1ta
.ha2t1at
.ha2t1e2
.ha2told
.ha1to
.há2m1a2
.1há
.há2ny1in
.hán2y
.há1nyi
.háro2m1e
.há1ro
.há2t1alj
.há1ta
.há2tus
.há1tu
.há2zol
.há1zo
.há2zó
.he2i
.1he
.hé2t1ez
.1hé
.hé1te
.hé2t1o
.hi2t1a
.1hi
.hi2tis
.hi1ti
.hodás1
.1ho
.ho1dá
.hol1l
.hol2t1e2
.ho2ne2
.hő2sá
.1hő
.i2
.ike2r1i
.i1ke
.ike1rü2
.ike2r1ü1lé
.ikon1s
.i1ko
.ima1s
.i1ma
.im1p2la
.in1ak1tí
.i2nakt
.i1na
.in2gin
.in1gi
.inte2r1a
.in1te
.io2n1a2
.i1o
.io2n1á
.io2ne
.ion3n
.ipa2re
.i1pa
.izo2m1ért
.1i2zo1mé
.i1zo
.í2
.íjá2t
.í1já
.íj1á1to
.í1n1e
.írá2s1ág
.í1rá
.írá1sá
.í2rá2s3z
.í1v1a2
.ív1á2r
.í1vá
.ív1ell
.í1ve
.í1z1a
.íz1in
.í1zi
.j2
.ja1ké2
.1ja
.ja2kér
.ja2ko2v
.ja1ko
.jármű1ká2
.1já
.jár1mű
.já2s1zá
.jás2z
.já2s1zó
.je2gy1a2
.1je
.jeg2y
.je2gy1á2
.je2l1a
.je2leg
.je1le
.je2lev
.job2b1ol
.1jo
.job1bo
.jó2dal
.1jó
.jó1da
.jó2s1e2
.jó2t1á
.k2
.kale2i
.1ka
.ka1le
.ka2nar
.ka1na
.ka2n1e
.kapolc1
.ka1po
.ka2ra1la
.ka1ra
.ka2ra2s
.ka2r1á2s
.ka1rá
.kar2c3se
.karc2s
.ka1re2
.ka2rem
.ka2rék
.ka1ré
.ka2ring
.ka1ri
.ka2rí
.ka2ró2ra
.ka1ró
.ka2r1ó2rák
.karó1rá
.ka2r1ü
.ka1th
.ka1tz
.2ká2r1a2d
.1ká
.ká1ra
.kás2
.kása3l
.ká1sa
.ke2c1só
.1ke
.kec2s
.ke2l1á2
.ke2l1e2g
.ke1le
.ke2l1e2ve
.ke1l1ö
.ker2ta
.ké2nét
.1ké
.ké1né
.ké2p1és
.ké1pé
.ké1ta2
.ké2tab
.ké2tad
.ké2t1ag
.ké2ta1ka
.ké2tal
.ké2tan
.ké2tap
.ké2tas
.ké2tat2
.ké2ta1u
.ké2t1á2
.ké2t1e1le
.ké1te
.ké2t1ez
.ké2t1o2
.ké1ze2
.ké2z1el
.ké2ze2m
.ké2z2s2
.kéz1z
.ki1á2
.1ki
.ki1g2
.ki1k1rá
.ki1ó2
.ki2ság
.ki1sá
.ki1ű2
.kla2uz
.k1la
.kla1u
.kle2i
.k1le
.kló2re
.k1ló
.ko2rác
.1ko
.ko1rá
.ko2rí
.ko2sis
.ko1si
.kó2d1a2
.1kó
.kó2r1e
.kó2r1é2s
.kó1ré
.kö2b1öl
.1kö
.kö1bö
.kö2d1ő
.kö2zis
.kö1zi
.kö2z1ő
.köz1z
.kr2
.ku1n1a
.1ku
.kvar3k.
.1k2vark
.k1va
.l2
.la2k1a2d
.1la
.la1ka
.l2a2kal
.l2a2k1an
.la2kép
.la1ké
.la2kor
.la1ko
.la2kő
.lan2t1e
.lan2t1ó2
.l2a2pal
.la1pa
.la2p1ác
.la1pá
.la2p1á2r
.la2p1e2
.la2p1or
.la1po
.la2p1os2z
.la2pó
.lá2b1e2
.1lá
.lá2bil
.lá1bi
.lá2bor
.lá1bo
.lán2c3s
.lá2nya2n
.lán2y
.lá1nya
.lá2ny1e2
.lá2p1e
.lá2p1il
.lá1pi2
.lá2z1ó2
.lá2z3s
.le3dé
.1le
.le2g1
.le3g2a1li
.le1ga
.le3g2elés
.le1ge
.lege1lé
.le3g2esle2g1
.1leges1le
.le3g2esle3g2esle2g1
.legesle1ge
.legesleges1le
.lege2t
.le4gé1ne
.le3gén
.le1gé
.leg3g2
.le3g2y
.lei2d
.le1i
.leí2ro
.le1í
.leí2ród
.leí1ró
.leí2ru
.le1kl
.le1k2r
.lemez1z
.le1me
.le1p2ré
.le1s2m
.le1t2r
.le1ü2
.lé2c3s2
.1lé
.lé2g1a2
.lé2g1á
.lé1ge2
.lé2g1el
.lé2gér
.lé1gé
.lé2go
.lé2gy1á2
.lég2y
.lé2p1a2
.lé1pü2
.1lé2p1ü1lé
.2lépül
.lé2t1a2
.lé2t1á2
.lé2t1elek
.lé1te
.léte1le
.1lé2t1e2lé
.lé2t1érd
.lé1té
.lé2tör
.lé1tö2
.lisz2ta
.1li
.lis2z
.lisz2t1á2
.lisz2ter
.lisz1te
.lito1s
.li1to
.2lo2b1e
.1lo
.lo1bi2
.lo2bin
.lo2mag
.lo1ma
.lo2mal
.lo2m1á
.lom2b1e2
.lo2me
.lo2m1é2t
.lo1mé
.lon2c1si
.lonc2s
.lófo2g1a2d
.1ló
.l2ófog
.ló1fo
.lófo1ga
.lő2cs1ö2v
.1lő
.lőc2s
.lő1c1sö
.lőrés3s
.lő1ré
.1ly1o
.l2y
.m2
.ma2e
.1ma
.m2a2ga2l
.ma1ga
.ma2ga2r
.ma2gál
.ma1gá
.ma2g1e2
.mag1g
.ma1gó2
.ma2gór
.ma2i2n.
.ma1i
.m2a2r1ác
.ma1rá
.ma2r1ing
.ma1ri
.masz2k1or
.mas2z
.masz1ko
.masz2k1ö
.ma1th
.ma2uz
.ma1u
.má2r1is
.1má
.má1ri
.me2g1e2
.1me
.me2g1é2
.meg1if
.me2gi
.meg1iﬀ
.me2g1o2
.me2g1ő2
.me2i
.mel2lá
.me2ny1u2
.men2y
.me2zá
.médi2af
.1mé
.mé1di
.médi1a
.médi2aﬀ
.mé2ná
.mé2no
.mé2s1za2
.més2z
.mé2szet
.mé1s1ze
.mé2s1zi
.mé2s1zo
.mé2zis
.mé1zi
.mi3rá
.1mi
.mo2lyan
.1mo
.mol2y
.mo1lya
.mű1i2
.1mű
.mű1kr
.mű1s
.n2
.na2gya
.1na
.nag2y
.na2gyá
.na2gye
.na2gyú2
.n2a2pap
.na1pa
.na2p1ar
.na2pál
.na1pá
.na2p1e
.na2pés
.na1pé
.na2p1o2r
.na1po
.na2pö
.ne2ma
.1ne
.ne2me2g
.ne1me
.ne2m1el
.ne2min
.ne1mi
.ne2ol
.ne1o
.ne2s1zá
.nes2z
.net2t1a2
.ne2um
.ne1u
.né2gyá
.1né
.nég2y
.né2pa2
.né2v1ál
